New York, session 2025-2026, A3917.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 259-u 2 to read as follows: 3 § 259-u. Emergency medical parole during a time of crisis. 1. During a 4 state disaster emergency, as defined in article two-B of this chapter 5 which places the lives, health or well-being of vulnerable people in 6 custody at risk, the board shall release to community supervision anyone 7 in custody who has a disability as defined in paragraph (a) of subdivi- 8 sion twenty-one of section two hundred ninety-two of this chapter and 9 who is at serious risk for death, disease or other harm due to such 10 emergency provided such person has a reasonably stable living situation 11 upon release and does not pose an unreasonable current public safety 12 risk. 13 2. Any individual released under these emergency circumstances shall 14 remain under community supervision, unless such supervision is revoked 15 pursuant to subdivision three of section two hundred fifty-nine-i of 16 this article, for the remainder of their sentence or until such time 17 that the commissioner decides it is appropriate to terminate such super- 18 vision pursuant to the limitations set forth in section two hundred five 19 of the correction law. 20 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07447-01-5